Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska53-207
Designated member, defined.

Designated member shall mean the spouse, child, grandchild, parent, brother, or sister of a deceased individual who owned an interest in a wholesaler who inherits the deceased individual's ownership interest under the terms of the deceased individual's will, who has otherwise succeeded the deceased individual in the wholesaler's business, or who inherits such ownership interest under the laws of intestate succession of this state. With respect to an incapacitated individual having an ownership interest in a wholesaler, the term shall mean the person appointed by the court as the conservator of such individual's property. The term shall also include the appointed and qualified personal representative and the testamentary trustee of a deceased individual having an ownership interest in a wholesaler.

Laws 1989, LB 371, § 7.